North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 9. Weatherization Assistance Program and Heating/Air Repair and Replacement Program.

§ 108A-70.30.

Recodified as Part 33 of Article 7 of Chapter 143B,

G.S. 143B-344.46

, by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 15.22(h), effective July 1, 2013.

§§ 108A-70.31 through 108A-70.35.

Reserved for future codification purposes.